Hawaii, session 2025, SB1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State recognized the National League of Families' POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in action) flag as an official state recognized flag in 2010 to acknowledge the commitment to resolving as fully as possible the fates of Americans still prisoner, missing, and unaccounted for. The legislature further finds that recognizing and acknowledging members of the community, their sacrifices, struggles, and successes can serve as a powerful reminder and symbol of societal values and collective memory and lessons learned to inform future generations. The legislature further finds that the honor and remember flag recognizes those whose lives have been lost while serving in the armed forces on behalf of their country.  It is a symbol and reminder to society of the high cost of liberty, and the gratitude and respect deserved by so many who have laid down their lives to secure it.  While there are many flags representing service to the United States, the honor and remember flag represents those who have made the ultimate sacrifice on its behalf. The legislature also finds that the pride flag serves as a beacon of visibility, solidarity, and celebration of love and identity.  The pride flag represents diversity, inclusion, the fight for equality and human rights, and is a symbol of both the challenges the LGBTQ+ community has faced and the progress society continues to make toward building a more perfect union that fulfills our nation's promise of equality and justice for all.  While there are many variations of the pride flag addressing different kinds of diversity, the traditional six‑color pride flag has represented these core values for over forty years and serves to encompass them all. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow the honor and remember flag and pride flag to be flown with the United States and Hawaiian flags at the state capitol and on certain state grounds on specified days. SECTION 2.  Section 5-18.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§5-18.5[]]  [POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in action) flag; recognition; use.] Official state recognized flags.  (a)  The State recognizes the National League of Families' POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in action) flag that was recognized by the United States Congress through P. L. 101‑355 on August 10, 1990. [(b)]  The National League of Families' POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in action) flag shall be flown on the grounds of the state capitol and on the grounds of the headquarters of the state department of defense on the following days: (1)  Armed Forces Day, the third Saturday in May; (2)  Memorial Day, the last Monday in May; (3)  Flag Day, June 14; (4)  Independence Day, July 4; (5)  National POW/MIA Recognition Day, the third Friday in September; and (6)  Veterans Day, November 11, and may be flown on the grounds of the state capitol and on the grounds of the headquarters of the state department of defense on other days; provided that if the Hawaiian flag is flown on the same halyard as the flag of the United States of America at those locations, then the POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in action) flag may be flown under the flag of the State of Hawaii, and if the Hawaiian flag is flown on a separate halyard as the flag of the United States of America at those locations, then the POW/MIA (prisoner of war/missing in action) flag may be flown under the flag of the United States of America. (b)  The State recognizes the honor and remember flag that has been designated by twenty-eight states to recognize armed service members who have died as a result of serving the United States in war or conflict. The honor and remember flag shall be flown on the grounds of the state capitol and on the grounds of the headquarters of the state department of defense on the following days: (1)  Armed Forces Day, the third Saturday in May; (2)  Memorial Day, the last Monday in May; (3)  Flag Day, June 14; (4)  Independence Day, July 4; (5)  National POW/MIA Recognition Day, the third Friday in September; and (6)  Veterans Day, November 11, and may be flown on the grounds of the state capitol and on the grounds of the headquarters of the state department of defense on other days; provided that if the Hawaiian flag is flown on the same halyard as the flag of the United States of America at those locations, then the honor and remember flag may be flown under the flag of the State of Hawaii, and if the Hawaiian flag is flown on a separate halyard as the flag of the United States of America at those locations, then the honor and remember flag may be flown under the flag of the United States of America. (c)  The State recognizes the striped six-color red, orange, green, blue, and violet rainbow "pride flag" to recognize diversity, inclusion, and equality and justice for all. The pride flag shall be flown on the grounds of the state capitol during pride month, on dates to be designated by the Hawaii state lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, plus commission established pursuant to section 369-3 and may be flown on the grounds of the state capitol and on the grounds of other state facilities on other days; provided that if the Hawaiian flag is flown on the same halyard as the flag of the United States of America at those locations, then the pride flag may be flown under the flag of the State of Hawaii, and if the Hawaiian flag is flown on a separate halyard as the flag of the United States of America at those locations, then the pride flag may be flown under the flag of the United States of America." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________